District of Columbia statutes.
47-2886.01

Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Professional Engineers’ Registration Act.

History

Sept. 19, 1950, 64 Stat. 854, ch. 953, § 1
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Cross References

Boards, commissions and committees, application of law, see § 1-321.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2301.
1973 Ed., § 2-1801.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.